Utah statutes.
59-10-1103.   Tax credit for pass-through entity taxpayer.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Pass-through entity" is as defined in Section 59-10-1402.

(b)  "Pass-through entity taxpayer" is as defined in Section 59-10-1402.

(2)  A pass-through entity taxpayer may claim a refundable tax credit against the tax otherwise due under this chapter if that pass-through entity taxpayer is a:

(a)  claimant;

(b)  estate; or

(c)  trust.

(3)  The tax credit described in Subsection (2) is equal to the amount paid or withheld by the pass-through entity on behalf of the pass-through entity taxpayer described in Subsection (2) in accordance with Section 59-10-1403.2.

(4)  A pass-through entity taxpayer may not claim a tax credit under this section for an amount for which the pass-through entity taxpayer claims a tax credit under Section 59-7-614.4.



Amended by Chapter 312, 2009 General Session

